Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 4
LICENSES, CERTIFICATES, AND FEES

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 11 of chapter 62, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1969, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1969, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

33-4-101. License agents - reports - board of claims - penalty for failure to account - rules.

The director may designate sole proprietors, partnerships, or corporations as license agents to sell hunting, fishing, trapping, and other licenses of the division. License agents shall be paid a commission, in an amount to be determined by rule by the commission, on all moneys collected for licenses sold. All agents authorized to sell licenses shall keep accurate records of all sales of licenses and shall make such reports to the division regarding license sales as may be required by the division. Such agents shall be required to give evidence of financial responsibility, in the form of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S., or an irrevocable letter of credit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101.5, C.R.S., or a bond, in such amount as may be fixed by the division based upon performance criteria established by the wildlife commission by rule, which may be less than the full value of consignment in an amount adequate to ensure the remittance of all moneys collected from such license sales, less amounts allowed as commissions, and the making of reports required by the division. The commission may promulgate rules for the establishment and cancellation of license agencies. All license moneys received shall be kept separate and apart from any other moneys of the agent authorized to sell licenses and shall at all times belong to the state. All moneys due from the sale of wildlife licenses shall belong to the state and shall draw interest at the rate of one and one-half percent per month from the date due.

The executive director, state auditor, and attorney general, or their duly designated representatives, shall constitute a board of claims for the hearing of all claims for relief when any license agent is unable to account for licenses and claims that the same have been destroyed, lost, or stolen. The findings of the board of claims are subject to review pursuant to section 24-4-106, C.R.S. Claims for relief in an amount totaling three hundred dollars or less shall not be determined by the board of claims, except as otherwise provided in this section, but shall be settled by the division. If the division offers to make settlement and such settlement is not accepted by the claimant, the claimant may submit his claim to the board of claims.

Every agent designated to sell licenses shall account for all licenses delivered to such agent. If any license agent is not able to account for any license, such agent shall be responsible for the maximum fee for which each unaccounted-for license could have been issued, except as provided in subsections (4) to (8) of this section.

Any agent designated to sell licenses may make a claim under oath for relief from responsibility for licenses which have been lost, stolen, or destroyed and for which such agent is unable to account, but no claim for relief shall be considered unless the agent making the claim informs the division of such loss, theft, or destruction within thirty days after such loss, theft, or destruction is discovered, said notice to set forth in detail all pertinent information then known to the agent. Upon receipt of any claim for relief, it is the duty of the division to make an investigation of the claim as soon as practicable, and for that purpose the claimant shall make available such records, information, or other pertinent data as may be in his possession or under his control. A written report of such investigation shall be filed by the division with the board of claims.

As soon as practicable after receipt of the investigator's report and in no event later than one hundred twenty days after receipt of notice of a claim for relief, the board of claims shall set a date for the hearing on such claim for relief, and the claimant may appear at the hearing if he so desires. The claimant shall be given not less than ten days' written notice of the date of the hearing, such notice to be mailed to his last-known address.

The board of claims may give relief to any claimant in the following circumstances and subject to the following limitations:

If the board of claims is satisfied that any licenses were destroyed due to fire, flood, act of God, or any other cause beyond the control of the claimant and that destruction was not due in part to his negligence, then the board of claims may entirely relieve the claimant of the responsibility to account for such licenses or make such lesser adjustment as the board of claims may deem proper.

If the board of claims is satisfied that any licenses were either lost, stolen, or destroyed under circumstances other than those set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), the board of claims may, in its discretion, make an adjustment of the amount due for any such licenses. The board of claims, in determining what adjustment, if any, shall be allowed for any lost, stolen, or destroyed licenses, may consider the following:

Whether or not, or the extent to which, the loss was due to the negligence or carelessness of the claimant in the handling of licenses, but no adjustment shall be made in the case of gross negligence or gross carelessness upon his part;

Such other evidence as the board of claims may consider pertinent.

The board of claims, in the event that it makes any adjustment upon a claim, may, in its discretion, require the use of such protection against the possibility of future loss, theft, or destruction of licenses as it may deem proper, including, but not limited to, the posting of corporate or personal surety bonds.

It is the legislative intent of subsections (2) to (7) of this section to provide in proper cases for the relief of license agents where licenses have been lost, stolen, or destroyed, which relief, however, shall be strictly construed, it being the further intent of such sections to encourage the proper and careful handling of licenses by license agents.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations for the cash sale of licenses, at a price which is discounted five percent from the face value thereof, to license agents of the division for resale to the public at the face value stated on such a license. Only the license agents of the division in good standing may qualify to purchase and sell under this subsection (9); except that no evidence of financial responsibility shall be required to qualify under this subsection (9). A post or base exchange of the United States government located in Colorado may qualify as a license agent for the purpose of this subsection (9). Failure to comply with all applicable rules and regulations of the commission and lawful directives of the division regarding license agents shall be grounds for the suspension or termination of the license agency, and, upon suspension or termination, all unsold licenses shall be returned immediately to the division for return of cash in the amount paid by the license agent for the licenses. The commission, in connection with a program which it may adopt under this subsection (9), shall provide for redemption by the division, at least annually, of any unsold licenses in the amount paid by the license agent for such unsold licenses. The provisions of subsections (1) to (8) of this section, except the provisions of subsection (1) regarding the designation of license agents, shall not apply to licenses sold under this subsection (9).

The commission may authorize certain employees to sell licenses for the face value thereof at the headquarters and regional offices of the division. Such employees are not entitled to five percent of the face value of the licenses and are not required to give evidence of financial responsibility. Such employees may make claims under oath for relief from responsibility for licenses or moneys which have been lost, stolen, or destroyed and for which the employees are unable to account in accordance with the provisions of subsections (4) to (8) of this section.

Any license agent who fails, upon demand of the division, to account for licenses or who fails to pay over to the division or its authorized representative money received from the sales of licenses commits theft as described in section 18-4-401.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 434, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-1.

L. 72:

p. 332, § 29.

L. 73:

p. 647, § 7.

L. 75:

(1), (3), and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 1306, § 7, effective July 14.

L. 76:

(3) amended, p. 311, § 57, effective May 20.

L. 77:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 1526, § 14, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(3) amended, p. 1217, § 11, effective June 21; (4) amended and (6) added, p. 1226, § 4, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 83:

(3) amended and (4) repealed, pp. 1289, 1291, §§ 2, 8, 9, effective January 1, 1984.

L. 84:

Entire section R&RE, p. 917, § 3, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

(11)(b) amended, p. 659, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1), (9), and (10) amended, p. 484, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(11)(b) amended, p. 847, § 122, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1578, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 99:

(1) and (11) amended, p. 1395, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 206, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2002:

(11)(b) amended, p. 1543, § 292, effective October 1.

L. 2005:

(1) and IP(11) amended, p. 474, § 6, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2021:

(11) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3258, § 549, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-4-112 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (11)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

33-4-101.3. Black bears - declaration of intent - spring season hunting prohibited - prohibited means of taking - penalty.

It is the intent of the voters of Colorado in adopting this measure to prohibit the taking of black bears when female black bears are rearing their cubs. It is the further intent of the voters of Colorado to promote the concept of fair chase in the taking of black bears by eliminating the use of bait and dogs. In considering proposed changes to the restrictions on the taking of black bears which are established in this measure, the Colorado general assembly shall take notice of the fact that this measure was adopted by a vote of the people at the 1992 general election.

During the period from March 1 through September 1 of any calendar year, it is unlawful for any person to take a black bear by any means including but not limited to firearm or bow and arrow.

It is unlawful for any person to take a black bear with the use of bait, or with the use of one or more dogs, at any time during any calendar year. In the event that a dog or dogs accidentally chases a black bear while the owner or person in control of such dog or dogs is in legal pursuit of other game, such owner or person in control of the dog or dogs shall not be charged with the illegal taking of a black bear so long as the dog or dogs are called off as soon as the mistake is realized and the black bear is not injured or killed.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to employees or agents of the division of parks and wildlife or to field agents of the United States department of agriculture when such employees or agents are acting in their official capacity, nor shall this section apply to any person who lawfully takes a black bear in defense of livestock, real property, a motor vehicle, or human life pursuant to section 33-3-106.

For purposes of this section, "bait" means to place, expose, deposit, distribute, or scatter salt, minerals, grain, animal parts, or other food, so as to constitute a lure, attraction, or enticement for black bears on or over any area where hunters are attempting to take black bears.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. In addition, persons convicted pursuant to this section shall have their wildlife license privileges suspended for five years and persons convicted of a second or subsequent offense pursuant to this section shall have their wildlife license privileges suspended permanently.

For the purposes of this section, "agent" means any qualified individual trained in wildlife procedures and operating under the direction of the division of parks and wildlife.

Source:

Initiated 92:

Entire section added, § 1, effective January 14, 1993.

L. 2002:

(4) amended and (7) added, p. 695, § 1, effective May 29; (6) amended, p. 1544, § 293, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1940, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

(6) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3258, § 550, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section was added by an initiated measure, effective January 14, 1993, prohibiting the taking of black bears under certain circumstances. The vote count on the measure at the general election held November 3, 1992, was as follows:

FOR: :u720 1,054,032

AGAINST: :u780 458,260

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (6), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

33-4-102. Types of licenses and fees - rules.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1.6) of this section, the division may issue the following resident and nonresident licenses and shall collect the following fees:

(1.1) to (1.3) Repealed.

(1.4) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1.5) and (1.6) of this section, the division may issue the following resident and nonresident licenses and shall collect the following fees:

(1.5) (a) With respect to the licenses authorized under subsections (1.4)(d.5) and (1.4)(e) of this section, the commission may raise the fees by rule as necessary to maintain sufficient funding for Colorado to remain eligible for federal funding made available to the states through the "Federal Aid In Sport Fish Restoration Act", 16 U.S.C. secs. 777 to 777k, as amended.

With respect to licenses authorized under subsection (1.4) of this section, the commission shall consider offering discounted licenses or license combinations for wildlife management or hunting and fishing recruitment purposes, including consideration of the creation of a resident low-income license.

(1.6) (a) By promulgation of appropriate rule, the commission may, from time to time, reduce a fee specified in this section and may, by promulgation of appropriate rule, later raise the license fee up to an amount not to exceed the statutory limit, when, in the judgment of the commission, one of the following conditions applies:

If the commission determines that it would be beneficial to issue the license in conjunction with another type of license and creates a combination license;

If the commission determines it is proper for management of the division or otherwise beneficial to the management of state wildlife resources. Licenses so discounted may be limited to certain geographic areas, by sex of the animal, or as otherwise deemed appropriate by the commission.

If the commission determines that an activity is regulated at both the state and federal levels and that issuance of a multi-year state license or collection of a reduced state annual license fee, or both, would help to coordinate state and federal regulation and reflect the administrative cost savings realized through coordination.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2018.)

For a fee or surcharge described in articles 1 to 6 of this title 33, the commission may, by rule, adjust the fee or surcharge by an amount up to the total amount reflected by the annual percentage change in the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index. The adjustment is not effective until the commission notifies the joint budget committee of the adjustment.

Repealed.

(1.7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate any senior lifetime license previously issued by the division.

(1.8) Repealed.

(1.9) (a) (I) The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

Service members returning from post-September 11, 2001, overseas contingency operations who have been injured during combat face a challenging period of rehabilitation upon their return to the United States;

Many of these service members are so severely injured that they require medical assistance for many years, or even the rest of their lives, as they reenter mainstream life;

Although the scope of care provided by the United States armed services wounded warrior programs varies with each service member, based on the needs of the individual, these service members may be assigned, upon return to Colorado, to a medical treatment facility such as Evans army hospital at Fort Carson, Colorado;

Wounded warrior programs are direct efforts by the United States armed services to care for service members during their long transition from combat-related injury to civilian life and to provide assistance to those service members in recovery, rehabilitation, and reintegration that is worthy of their service and sacrifice; and

For those wounded warriors who suffer injuries so severe that they will require intense, ongoing care or assistance for many years or the rest of their lives, a significant part of the healing process is enabling and encouraging these service members to experience some of the recreational activities they enjoyed prior to their service-related injuries.

The general assembly therefore recognizes the need to provide opportunities for Colorado's severely injured "wounded warriors" to enjoy the natural resources of the state as part of their rehabilitative care. Furthermore, offering reduced-cost or free big game hunting licenses to such recovering service members is a small, but recognizable, acknowledgment of their selfless service and sacrifice.

The commission may promulgate rules to reduce or eliminate big game license fees and establish a big game hunting license preference for members of the United States armed services wounded warrior programs who are residents of, or stationed in, Colorado and who have been so severely injured that they will require years of intense, ongoing care or assistance.

As used in this subsection (1.9), "United States armed services wounded warrior programs" means:

The Army wounded warrior (AW2) program;

The Air Force wounded warrior (AFW2) program;

The Navy safe harbor program;

The Coast Guard wounded warrior regiment; and

Any successor program administered by a branch of the United States armed services to provide individualized support for service members who have been severely injured in overseas contingency operations undertaken since September 11, 2001.

The commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection (1.9), including rules defining "severely injured" and establishing residency requirements for service members eligible under this subsection (1.9).

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1.6) of this section, the division may issue the following special licenses and shall collect the following fees:

Fees

Scientific collecting license for the collection of wildlife species

outside of established seasons and bag limits ....................
$ 28.00

Importation license, issued for the purpose of importing wildlife

into the state ....................
75.00

Field trial license .................... 23.00

Commercial lake license, issued for the operation of privately

owned lakes for purposes of charging customers to fish; live fish or viable

gametes may not be sold or transported from the premises ....................
200.00

Private lake license, issued for the operation of privately owned

lakes for the purpose of fishing when no fee is charged; fish or gametes

may not be sold, and live fish or viable gametes may not be transported

from the premises ....................
14.00

Commercial wildlife park license, issued for the operation of

privately owned wildlife parks and for related buying, selling, or trading of

lawfully acquired wildlife or for charging customers to hunt at the park ....................
150.00

Noncommercial park license, issued to persons who wish to

keep lawfully acquired native birds except raptors as pets ....................
28.00

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 199, § 4, effective June 7, 1991.)

Wildlife sanctuary license .................... 150.00

The fee for any license issued by the division for which a fee is not provided in subsection (1), (1.4), or (2) of this section must not exceed one hundred dollars.

Repealed.

Any person may obtain more than one one-day or five-day fishing license during a calendar year. The effective date shall appear on every such fishing license. Said date may be the date it is procured or any future date during the fishing season specified by the license.

Moneys received in payment for any licenses issued under this title shall not be refunded except for proven error committed by the division in issuing licenses or upon the death of a licensee in possession of a big game license if death occurs before the starting date of the season specified on said license or if authorized by the director under rules of the commission.

Repealed.

Any person claiming residency in Colorado as set forth in section 33-1-102, for the purpose of purchasing a resident license of any kind, must produce evidence of such residency at the time of purchase.

(7.5) The division or a license agent issuing a license on the division's behalf need not comply with section 24-72.1-103 concerning secure and verifiable identity documents when issuing a license pursuant to this section.

In the event of the loss, theft, or destruction of any wildlife license issued by the division, the person to whom the license was issued may receive a duplicate license from the division upon payment of a fee of up to fifty percent of the cost of the original license, not to exceed twenty-five dollars, as established by the commission by rule, and completion of an affidavit stating where and by whom the license was issued and the circumstances under which the license was lost, stolen, or destroyed. In the event the division determines that the original license has been lost or destroyed in the mail, the person to whom the license was issued may obtain a duplicate license from the division without charge by submitting to the division a signed affidavit stating that the license was never received.

(8.5) (a) Except for the annual Colorado wildlife habitat stamp, the lifetime Colorado wildlife stamp, the migratory waterfowl stamp, and the youth small game hunting license, the commission shall, by rule, assess a surcharge in an amount not to exceed one dollar and fifty cents on each license listed in subsections (1) and (1.4) of this section that is sold by the division or one of its license agents pursuant to section

33-4-101

. Revenues derived from the assessment of the surcharge, together with any interest earned on the revenues, shall be deposited into the wildlife management public education fund created in section

33-1-112

(3.5)(a).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 469, § 1, effective January 1, 2006.)

All licenses issued pursuant to this section expire on the date written or printed thereon, unless otherwise provided by the commission or by any other law.

Repealed.

With respect to licenses that are issued in limited numbers for the taking of game wildlife, the division may collect from each resident license applicant a nonrefundable processing fee not to exceed ten dollars and from each nonresident license applicant a nonrefundable processing fee not to exceed twenty dollars, which fees the commission shall establish by rule.

A person holding a valid aquaculture facility permit pursuant to section 35-24.5-109, C.R.S., may charge a fee for fishing at the production facility; no state fishing license is required.

Several satellite stations of a fish production facility may operate under one aquaculture license provided all such satellite stations are listed on such license.

The commission shall establish a license classification for zoological parks. Each licensed zoological park shall be subject to the following requirements:

The primary purpose of the park shall be the exhibition of captive wild or exotic animals for the education of the general public; except that this subparagraph (I) shall not be construed to prohibit the carrying on of reasonable incidental activities such as propagation, purchase, sale, and exchange of animals;

The park shall be operated under the direction of a professional staff that has generally recognized formal or practical training in the husbandry of the types of animals kept in the park;

The park shall have a state-licensed veterinarian on staff or under contract with the park and available to provide professional consultation and care when needed;

The park shall maintain regular hours during which it is open to the public;

The animals kept at the park shall be confined by at least one fence or other enclosure surrounding the area in which they are housed or displayed and by at least one additional fence, no less than eight feet in height, surrounding the perimeter of the park.

A licensed zoological park may move animals within Colorado in connection with the buying, selling, exchanging, or loaning of such animals with another licensed or accredited zoological park or in connection with the export of such animals from Colorado.

No licensed zoological park may import noncervid ruminants or camelids into Colorado unless, in each such instance, the animal has been subjected to the following process:

Before importation, the animal is tested for tuberculosis and found not to be infected;

After such test, the animal is imported and held in isolation in an isolation facility for a continuous period of least sixty days; and

After the end of such isolation period, the animal is again tested for tuberculosis. If the test result is negative, the animal may then be incorporated into the animal population of the park.

Importation and testing of cervid animals by licensed zoological parks shall be subject to regulation by the division.

A license issued to a zoological park shall cover the park and also other property used in conjunction with the park for the selling, buying, brokering, trading, or breeding of or caring for animals used at the park. Animals may be moved between the park and such other property as may be reasonably necessary for the operation of the park.

The annual fee for a zoological park license shall not exceed the annual fee for a commercial park license.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (g), this subsection (13) does not apply to any zoological park that is accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association. Any intrastate transfer and movement of wildlife by a zoological park accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association to another zoological park accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association is not subject to the rules of the commission regarding movement and disease testing.

Any intrastate transfer and movement of wildlife by a zoological park accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association to any person or entity not accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association is subject to the rules of the commission regarding movement and disease testing.

The wildlife sanctuary shall have a state-licensed veterinarian on staff or under contract with the sanctuary and available to provide professional consultation and care when needed.

The commission shall establish a license classification for wildlife sanctuaries. Each license for a wildlife sanctuary shall be subject to the following requirements:

(I) The purpose of the wildlife sanctuary shall be to operate as a place of refuge where abused, neglected, unwanted, impounded, abandoned, orphaned, or displaced wildlife are provided care for their lifetime;

(II) The wildlife sanctuary shall be operated under the direction of a professional staff that has generally-recognized formal or practical training in the husbandry of the types of wildlife kept at the sanctuary; and

An application for a license for a wildlife sanctuary shall include the following:

The name, complete street address, mailing address if different from the street address, and telephone number of the facility;

Evidence of the wildlife sanctuary's status under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code";

The specific location where wildlife is housed;

The current wildlife inventory, including the common and scientific name, gender, age, and origin of each animal; and

A signed statement by a licensed veterinarian stating the veterinarian is the veterinarian of record for the applicant and the veterinarian's complete address, telephone number, and license number. The veterinarian shall certify that the veterinarian has observed each of the applicant's animals at least once during the previous three months and that the wildlife have been appropriately immunized and cared for.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, revenue generated from the fees increased by House Bill 05-1266, enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-fifth general assembly, shall be used to implement key priorities in the commission's strategic plan.

Click to view form

Click to view form

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 435, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-11-2.

L. 72:

p. 333, § 30.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1317, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(1)(g) and (1)(h) amended, p. 1541, § 2, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(1)(s) and (2) amended and (4) added, p. 1236, § 1, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 82:

(1)(s) and (2) RC&RE, p. 518, § 1, effective March 11.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1287, § 1, effective January 1, 1984.

L. 84:

(4) and (7) amended and (10) repealed, pp. 920, 925, §§ 4, 19, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 87:

(11) added, p. 1268, § 1, effective January 1, 1988.

L. 89:

(1.1) to (1.8) added and (5) and (8) amended, pp. 1343, 1345, §§ 4, 5, effective July 1; (1)(x) added, p. 1347, § 1, effective February 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(2)(d) and (2)(e) amended and (2)(h) and (12) added, p. 1530, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 91:

(6) amended, p. 1412, § 1, effective April 4; (4) repealed, p. 1920, § 47, effective June 1; (2)(h) and (12)(a) amended, p. 199, § 4, effective June 7.

Initiated 92:

(1)(n) repealed, effective January 14, 1993.

L. 93:

(1.4)(v) added, p. 431, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 94:

(1.4)(i) amended and (1.4)(w) and (1.4)(x) added, p. 1220, § 3, effective May 22; (1.4)(n) repealed, p. 1644, § 73, effective May 31; (1.6)(c) and (13) added and (6)(a) amended, pp. 1578, 1579, §§ 4, 5, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(13)(b) amended and (13)(g) added, p. 17, § 1, effective March 9.

L. 97:

(1.4)(v) amended, p. 766, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 98:

IP(1), (1.5), (1.6), and IP(2) amended, p. 1338, § 57, effective June 1.

L. 99:

(8.5) added, p. 1396, § 3, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

(1.4)(l), (1.4)(m), (1.4)(o) to (1.4)(t), (1.4)(w), and (1.6) amended, p. 1405, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2001:

IP(1.6)(a) and (1.6)(a)(II) amended, p. 40, § 1, effective March 11.

L. 2003:

IP(1.4) and (1.4)(x) amended, p. 1031, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2)(i) and (14) added, p. 1324, §§ 4, 5, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1)(v), (1)(w), (1.4), (1.5), (1.6)(b), (3), and (8.5) amended and (1)(y) and (15) added, pp. 469, 472, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2006; (1.4)(v)(I) amended, p. 780, § 68, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2009:

(1.4)(y) amended and (1.6)(c) added, (SB 09-235), ch. 388, p. 2097, §§ 4, 3, effective July 1, 2010; (1.4)(z) and (1.4)(aa) amended, (SB 09-235), ch. 388, p. 2096, §§ 2, 1, effective April 1, 2011.

L. 2010:

(1.9) added, (SB 10-211), ch. 292, p. 1354, § 1, effective May 26; (6)(b) repealed, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2120, § 169, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(9) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1208, § 19, effective June 4.

L. 2013:

(1.6)(c) repealed, (SB 13-175), ch. 243, p. 1175, § 3, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(1.6)(b) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1717, § 69, effective May 29; (1), (1.4), (1.6)(a), (1.6)(b), (2), (3), (8), (8.5)(a), and (11) amended, (1.5) RC&RE, and (1.8) and (14)(c) repealed, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1328, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(7.5) added, (HB 20-1087), ch. 49, p. 167, § 3, effective March 20.

33-4-102.5. Issuance of migratory waterfowl stamp - prohibition against hunting without stamp.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "migratory waterfowl" means any wild goose or duck.

All persons sixteen years of age or older shall procure a state migratory waterfowl stamp before hunting or taking any migratory waterfowl within Colorado. Such stamp shall be in the possession of the person while hunting or taking any migratory waterfowl.

The stamp is valid through the last day of June following its issuance.

The division may grant up to twenty-five percent of the funds derived from the sale of state migratory waterfowl stamps to appropriate nonprofit organizations for implementation of the North American waterfowl management plan. The nonprofit organizations shall use the funds for the development of waterfowl propagation areas within the dominion of Canada or the United States that specifically provide waterfowl for the central flyway, pacific flyway, or both. A nonprofit organization granted money pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) shall not use the money for lobbying or any other political purpose.

The commission may enter into a contract with a nonprofit waterfowl conservation organization for the purpose of providing the form and design of the migratory waterfowl stamp. Such contract shall provide that such nonprofit waterfowl conservation organization shall select a form and design. At least one of the alternative pieces of artwork considered for final selection shall be the work of an artist who is a resident of Colorado. In addition, such contract shall designate the ownership of the publication rights for any art prints or other facsimiles of the migratory waterfowl stamp and the disposition of any proceeds. The division shall not be an eligible contractor, unless no contract can be negotiated with a nonprofit waterfowl conservation organization.

All money received pursuant to the issuance of the migratory waterfowl stamp shall be used for the sole benefit of migratory waterfowl habitat conservation and related capital improvements and is subject to an annual appropriation.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1347, § 2, effective February 1, 1990.

L. 93:

(6) repealed, p. 507, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 1580, § 6, effective May 31.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 1339, § 58, effective June 1.

L. 2018:

(3) and (5) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1334, § 7, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.